Utah statutes.
32B-3-203.   Initiating a disciplinary proceeding.

Subject to Section 32B-3-202:

(1)  The department may initiate a disciplinary proceeding described in Subsection (2) if the department receives:

(a)  a report from an investigator alleging that a person subject to administrative action violated this title or the rules of the commission;

(b)  a final adjudication of criminal liability against a person subject to administrative action on the basis of an alleged violation of this title; or

(c)  a final adjudication of civil liability in accordance with Chapter 15, Alcoholic Product Liability Act, against a person subject to administrative action on the basis of an alleged violation of this title.

(2)  If the condition of Subsection (1) is met, the department may initiate a disciplinary proceeding to determine:

(a)  whether a person subject to administrative action violated this title or rules of the commission; and

(b)  if a violation is found, the appropriate sanction to be imposed.

(3) (a)  Unless waived by the respondent, a disciplinary proceeding shall be held:

(i)  if required by law;

(ii)  before revoking or suspending a license, permit, or certificate of approval issued under this title; or

(iii)  before imposing a fine against a person subject to administrative action.

(b)  Inexcusable failure of a respondent to appear at a scheduled disciplinary proceeding hearing after receiving proper notice is an admission of the charged violation.

(c)  The validity of a disciplinary proceeding is not affected by the failure of a person to attend or remain in attendance.



Amended by Chapter 369, 2012 General Session

